Hawaii, session 2025, HB1192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that alert programs like the AMBER alert and silver alert have been highly successful tools for helping to locate missing persons. According to the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children, since the implementation of the AMBER alert in 1996, 1,221 missing children have been recovered due to its use.  The same center reports that since 2022, more than six thousand silver alerts have been activated nationally, and more than eighty per cent of those missing elders were safely located. The legislature recognizes that in missing persons cases, it can be critical to locate the person quickly.  Law enforcement agencies have emphasized that the first seventy-two hours of a missing person investigation offer the best hope of finding helpful witnesses and of locating the person alive.  By quickly disseminating information in cases involving child abduction or a missing elder, the AMBER and silver alerts allow the community to assist in the search. Based on the success of the AMBER alert and silver alert programs, the legislature believes that a wider age range of missing persons would benefit from a similar alert.  A more expansive alert system would also benefit Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander women and children between the ages of fifteen and seventeen, who are disproportionately represented in the State's missing person cases. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish an alert program in remembrance of Charli Scott, a twenty‑seven year old woman who went missing and was murdered by her former partner on the island of Maui.  The intent of the Charli alert is to supplement the AMBER alert and silver alert and to help locate a broader age range of vulnerable persons who go missing in the State. SECTION 2.  Chapter 353C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§353C-     Charli alert program.  (a)  The department shall develop and implement a Charli alert program to rapidly disseminate information about a person subject to the alert. (b)  If a person is reported missing to a law enforcement agency and that agency determines that the conditions of subsection (g) are met, the agency may request the department to activate a Charli alert.  If the department concurs that the conditions of subsection (g) are met, the department shall activate a Charli alert within the geographical area requested by the investigating law enforcement agency. (c) Radio, television, cable, and satellite systems are encouraged to, but not required to, cooperate with disseminating the information contained in a Charli alert. (d) Upon the activation of a Charli alert, the department shall assist the investigating law enforcement agency by issuing a be-on-the-lookout alert, issuing an electronic flyer, or activating a changeable message sign, as permissible. (e) The department, as permitted, may use the Wireless Emergency Alerts System. (f) The department, as permitted, may use a changeable message sign if the following conditions are met: (1)  The investigating law enforcement agency determines that a vehicle may be involved in the missing person incident; and (2)  Specific vehicle identification is available for public dissemination. (g)  A law enforcement agency may request from the department that a Charli alert be activated if the agency determines that all of the following conditions are met regarding the investigation of the missing person: (1)  The missing person is between the ages of eighteen and sixty-four; (2)  The law enforcement agency has utilized all available local resources; (3)  The law enforcement agency determines that the person has gone missing under unexplained or suspicious circumstances; (4)  The law enforcement agency believes that the missing person is in the company of a potentially dangerous person, or there are other factors indicating that the missing person may be in peril, including factors indicating that the missing person has been the victim of domestic violence; and (5)  There is information that, if disseminated to the public, could assist in the safe recovery of the missing person. (h)  For purposes of this section, "Charli alert" means a notification activated pursuant to this section, designed to issue and coordinate alerts with respect to a situation that meets the conditions of subsection (g)." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and use of the Charli alert program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of law enforcement for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________